Tennessee, session 114, SB0121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-221(a)(1), is amended by
deleting "LEA" and substituting "LEA and public charter school", deleting "school district"
wherever it appears and substituting "school district or public charter school", deleting "school
district's" wherever it appears and substituting "school district's or public charter school's",
adding "or public charter school's" after "LEA's", and adding the following as a new subdivision:
(G) Prohibit the LEA or public charter school from tracking or monitoring a
person's use of the internet via a personal electronic device on school property, except
for instances in which a student uses a personal electronic device during a test.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-221(b), is amended by adding
"or director of the public charter school" after "director of schools" and deleting "school district's"
and substituting "LEA's or public charter school's".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-1-221(c), is amended by deleting
"LEA or" wherever it appears and substituting "LEA, public charter school, or" and deleting
"LEA's or" wherever it appears and substituting "LEA's, public charter school's, or".
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0121
000542
- 1 -